Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169A.55, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Reinstatement of driving privileges; certain criminal vehicular operation offenses. A person whose driver's license has been revoked under section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end (revocation, criminal vehicular operation), or suspended under section 171.187 (suspension, criminal vehicular operation), for a violation of section 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4), subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4), or subdivision 3, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); or section 609.2114, subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iii) (criminal vehicular operation, alcohol-related provisions), resulting in bodily harm, substantial bodily harm, or great bodily harm, shall not be eligible for reinstatement of driving privileges until the person has submitted to the commissioner verification of the use of ignition interlock for the applicable time period specified in those sections. To be eligible for reinstatement under this subdivision, a person shall utilize an ignition interlock device that meets the performance standards and certification requirements under subdivision 4, paragraph (c). Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.0605, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Evidence; identity; date of birth. (a) Only the following is satisfactory evidence of an applicant's identity and date of birth under section 171.06, subdivision 3, paragraph (b): (1) a driver's license or identification card that: (i) complies with all requirements of the REAL ID Act; (ii) is not designated as temporary or limited term; and (iii) is current or has been expired for five years or less; (2) a valid, unexpired United States passport, including a passport booklet or passport card, issued by the United States Department of State; (3) a certified copy of a birth certificate issued by a government bureau of vital statistics or equivalent agency in the applicant's state of birth, which must bear the raised or authorized seal of the issuing government entity; (4) a consular report of birth abroad, certification of report of birth, or certification of birth abroad, issued by the United States Department of State, Form FS-240, Form DS-1350, or Form FS-545; (5) a valid, unexpired permanent resident card issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security or the former Immigration and Naturalization Service of the United States Department of Justice, Form I-551. If the Form I-551 validity period has been automatically extended by the United States Department of Homeland Security, it is deemed unexpired, regardless of the expiration date listed; (6) a foreign passport with an unexpired temporary I-551 stamp or a temporary I-551 printed notation on a machine-readable immigrant visa with a United States Department of Homeland Security admission stamp within the validity period; (7) a United States Department of Homeland Security Form I-94 or Form I-94A with a photograph and an unexpired temporary I-551 stamp; (8) a United States Department of State Form DS-232 with a United States Department of Homeland Security admission stamp and validity period; (9) a certificate of naturalization issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, Form N-550 or Form N-570; (10) a certificate of citizenship issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, Form N-560 or Form N-561; (11) an unexpired employment authorization document issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, Form I-766 or Form I-688B. If the Form I-766 validity period has been automatically extended by the United States Department of Homeland Security, it is deemed unexpired, regardless of the expiration date listed; (12) a valid, unexpired passport issued by a foreign country and a valid, unexpired United States visa accompanied by documentation of the applicant's most recent lawful admittance into the United States;new text begin ornew text end (13) a document as designated by the United States Department of Homeland Security under Code of Federal Regulations, title 6, part 37.11 (c)(1)(x)deleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (14) a copy of the applicant's certificate of marriage certified by the issuing government jurisdiction; deleted text end deleted text begin (15) a certified copy of a court order that specifies the applicant's name change; or deleted text end deleted text begin (16) a certified copy of a divorce decree or dissolution of marriage that specifies the applicant's name change, issued by a court. deleted text end (b) A document under paragraph (a) must be legible and unaltered. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.0605, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Evidence of name change. new text end new text begin The following is satisfactory evidence of an applicant's name change: new text end new text begin (1) a copy of the applicant's certificate of marriage certified by the issuing government jurisdiction; new text end new text begin (2) a certified copy of a court order that specifies the applicant's name change; or new text end new text begin (3) a certified copy of a court-issued divorce decree or dissolution of marriage that specifies the applicant's name change. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.17, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Offenses. (a) The department deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end immediately revoke the license of a driver upon receiving a record of the driver's conviction of: (1) manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin under section 609.20 or 609.205;new text end new text begin (2)new text end criminal vehicular homicide or injury under section 609.2112, 609.2113, or 609.2114, or Minnesota Statutes 2012, section 609.21; deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end a violation of section 169A.20 or 609.487; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end a felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle was used; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end failure to stop and disclose identity and render aid, as required under section 169.09, in the event of a motor vehicle accident, resulting in the death or personal injury of another; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement to the department under any law relating to the application, ownership, or operation of a motor vehicle, including on the certification required under section 171.05, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (1), item (ii), subitem (C), to issue an instruction permit to a homeschool student; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end except as this section otherwise provides, three charges of violating within a period of 12 months any of the provisions of chapter 169 or of the rules or municipal ordinances enacted in conformance with chapter 169, for which the accused may be punished upon conviction by imprisonment; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end two or more violations, within five years, of the misdemeanor offense described in section 169.444, subdivision 2, paragraph (a); deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end the gross misdemeanor offense described in section 169.444, subdivision 2, paragraph (b); deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end an offense in another state that, if committed in this state, would be grounds for revoking the driver's license; or deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end a violation of an applicable speed limit by a person driving in excess of 100 miles per hour. The person's license must be revoked for six months for a violation of this clause, or for a longer minimum period of time applicable under section 169A.53, 169A.54, or 171.174. (b) The department deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end immediately revoke the school bus endorsement of a driver upon receiving a record of the driver's conviction of the misdemeanor offense described in section 169.443, subdivision 7. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.2405, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment. (a) A city or county may establish a license reinstatement diversion program for holders of class D drivers' licenses who have been charged with violating section 171.24, subdivision 1 or 2. An individual charged with driving after revocation under section 171.24, subdivision 2, is eligible for diversion only if the revocation was due to a violation of section 169.791; 169.797; 169A.52; 169A.54; 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end ; or 171.177. An individual who is a holder of a commercial driver's license or who has committed an offense in a commercial motor vehicle is not eligible to participate in the diversion program. Nothing in this section authorizes the issuance of a driver's license to a diversion program participant during the underlying suspension or revocation period at issue in the violation of section 171.24, subdivision 1 or 2. (b) Notwithstanding any law or ordinance to the contrary, a city or county may contract with a third party to create and administer the diversion program under this section. Any participating city or county, at its own expense, may request an audit of the administrator. (c) For purposes of this section, "administrator" means the city, county, or administrator of the program. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.301, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Conditions of issuance. (a) The commissioner may issue a reintegration driver's license to any person: (1) who is 18 years of age or older; (2) who has been released from a period of at least 180 consecutive days of confinement or incarceration in: (i) an adult correctional facility under the control of the commissioner of corrections or licensed by the commissioner of corrections under section 241.021; (ii) a federal correctional facility for adults; or (iii) an adult correctional facility operated under the control or supervision of any other state; and (3) whose license has been suspended or revoked under the circumstances listed in section 171.30, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (4), for a violation that occurred before the individual was incarcerated for the period described in clause (2). (b) If the person's driver's license or permit to drive has been revoked under section 169.792 or 169.797, the commissioner may only issue a reintegration driver's license to the person after the person has presented an insurance identification card, policy, or written statement indicating that the driver or owner has insurance coverage satisfactory to the commissioner. (c) If the person's driver's license or permit to drive has been suspended under section 171.186, the commissioner may only issue a reintegration driver's license to the person after the commissioner receives notice of a court order provided pursuant to section 518A.65, paragraph (e), showing that the person's driver's license or operating privileges should no longer be suspended. (d) If the person's driver's license has been revoked under section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1)new text begin or (2)new text end , the commissioner may only issue a reintegration driver's license to the person after the person has completed the applicable revocation period. (e) The commissioner must not issue a reintegration driver's license: (1) to any person described in section 171.04, subdivision 1, clause (7), (8), (10), or (11); (2) to any person described in section 169A.55, subdivision 5; (3) if the person has committed a violation after the person was released from custody that results in the suspension, revocation, or cancellation of a driver's license, including suspension for nonpayment of child support or maintenance payments as described in section 171.186, subdivision 1; or (4) if the issuance would conflict with the requirements of the nonresident violator compact. (f) The commissioner must not issue a class A, class B, or class C reintegration driver's license. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.306, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) As used in this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given them. (b) "Ignition interlock device" or "device" means equipment that is designed to measure breath alcohol concentration and to prevent a motor vehicle's ignition from being started by a person whose breath alcohol concentration measures 0.02 or higher on the equipment. (c) "Location tracking capabilities" means the ability of an electronic or wireless device to identify and transmit its geographic location through the operation of the device. (d) "Program participant" means a person who has qualified to take part in the ignition interlock program under this section, and whose driver's license has been: (1) revoked, canceled, or denied under section 169A.52; 169A.54; 171.04, subdivision 1, clause (10); or 171.177; or (2) revoked under section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end , or suspended under section 171.187, for a violation of section 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); or subdivision 3, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); or 609.2114, subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4), resulting in bodily harm, substantial bodily harm, or great bodily harm. (e) "Qualified prior impaired driving incident" has the meaning given in section 169A.03, subdivision 22. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.306, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Issuance of restricted license. (a) The commissioner shall issue a class D driver's license, subject to the applicable limitations and restrictions of this section, to a program participant who meets the requirements of this section and the program guidelines. The commissioner shall not issue a license unless the program participant has provided satisfactory proof that: (1) a certified ignition interlock device has been installed on the participant's motor vehicle at an installation service center designated by the device's manufacturer; and (2) the participant has insurance coverage on the vehicle equipped with the ignition interlock device. If the participant has previously been convicted of violating section 169.791, 169.793, or 169.797 or the participant's license has previously been suspended, revoked, or canceled under section 169.792 or 169.797, the commissioner shall require the participant to present an insurance identification card that is certified by the insurance company to be noncancelable for a period not to exceed 12 months. (b) A license issued under authority of this section must contain a restriction prohibiting the program participant from driving, operating, or being in physical control of any motor vehicle not equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device certified by the commissioner. A participant may drive an employer-owned vehicle not equipped with an interlock device while in the normal course and scope of employment duties pursuant to the program guidelines established by the commissioner and with the employer's written consent. (c) A program participant whose driver's license has been: (1) revoked under section 169A.52, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (1), (2), or (3), or subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (1), (2), or (3); 169A.54, subdivision 1, clause (1), (2), (3), or (4); or 171.177, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (1), (2), or (3), or subdivision 5, paragraph (a), clause (1), (2), or (3); or (2) revoked under section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end , or suspended under section 171.187, for a violation of section 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); or subdivision 3, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); or 609.2114, subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4), resulting in bodily harm, substantial bodily harm, or great bodily harm, where the participant has fewer than two qualified prior impaired driving incidents within the past ten years or fewer than three qualified prior impaired driving incidents ever; may apply for conditional reinstatement of the driver's license, subject to the ignition interlock restriction. (d) A program participant whose driver's license has been: (1) revoked, canceled, or denied under section 169A.52, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (4), (5), or (6), or subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (4), (5), or (6); 169A.54, subdivision 1, clause (5), (6), or (7); or 171.177, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (4), (5), or (6), or subdivision 5, paragraph (a), clause (4), (5), or (6); or (2) revoked under section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end , or suspended under section 171.187, for a violation of section 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); or subdivision 3, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4); or 609.2114, subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iii), (3), or (4), resulting in bodily harm, substantial bodily harm, or great bodily harm, where the participant has two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents within the past ten years or three or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents ever; may apply for conditional reinstatement of the driver's license, subject to the ignition interlock restriction, if the program participant is enrolled in a licensed substance use disorder treatment or rehabilitation program as recommended in a chemical use assessment. As a prerequisite to eligibility for eventual reinstatement of full driving privileges, a participant whose chemical use assessment recommended treatment or rehabilitation shall complete a licensed substance use disorder treatment or rehabilitation program. If the program participant's ignition interlock device subsequently registers a positive breath alcohol concentration of 0.02 or higher, the commissioner shall extend the time period that the participant must participate in the program until the participant has reached the required abstinence period described in section 169A.55, subdivision 4. (e) Notwithstanding any statute or rule to the contrary, the commissioner has authority to determine when a program participant is eligible for restoration of full driving privileges, except that the commissioner shall not reinstate full driving privileges until the program participant has met all applicable prerequisites for reinstatement under section 169A.55 and until the program participant's device has registered no positive breath alcohol concentrations of 0.02 or higher during the preceding 90 days.